Florida, session 2026, HB1051.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
49
50 Section 1. Subsection (3) of section 125.572, Florida
Page 2 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1051-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1051 2026
51 Statutes, is amended to read:
52 125.572 Regulation of synthetic turf.—
53 (3)(a) Upon the Department of Environmental Protection
54 adopting rules pursuant to subsection (4), a local government
55 may not:
56 1.(a) Adopt or enforce any ordinance, resolution, order,
57 rule, or policy that prohibits, or is enforced to prohibit, a
58 property owner from installing synthetic turf that complies with
59 Department of Environmental Protection standards adopted
60 pursuant to this section which apply to single-family
61 residential property.
62 2.(b) Adopt or enforce any ordinance, resolution, order,
63 rule, or policy that regulates synthetic turf which is
64 inconsistent with the Department of Environmental Protection
65 standards adopted pursuant to this section which apply to
66 single-family residential property.
67 (b) This subsection does not apply to the adoption or
68 enforcement of any resolution, order, rule, or policy by a
69 community development district to enforce deed restrictions.
70 Section 2. Subsection (7) of section 190.003, Florida
71 Statutes, is amended to read:
72 190.003 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
73 (7) "Compact, urban, mixed-use district" means a district
74 consisting of a maximum of 75 acres which is located within a
75 municipality, and within either a qualified opportunity zone
Page 3 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1051-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1051 2026
76 designated by the United States Department of the Treasury
77 pursuant to 26 U.S.C. s. 1400Z-1 or a community redevelopment
78 area created pursuant to s. 163.356, which district that
79 consists of a maximum of 75 acres, and has development
80 entitlements of:
81 (a) At least 400,000 square feet of retail development and
82 500 residential units; or
83 (b) At least 250,000 square feet of commercial development
84 and 500 residential rental units that are affordable for very-
85 low-income, low-income, or moderate-income persons, as defined
86 in s. 420.0004, s. 420.602, or s. 420.9071.
87 Section 3. Section 190.0071, Florida Statutes, is created
88 to read:
89 190.0071 Community development district recall.—
90 (1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
91 (a) "Clerk," as the context requires, means:
92 1. If the community development district was established
93 by ordinance of a local general-purpose government pursuant to
94 s. 190.005(2), the clerk of such local general-purpose
95 government.
96 2. If the community development district was established
97 by rule of the Florida Land and Water Adjudicatory Commission
98 pursuant to s. 190.005(1), the clerk of the circuit court of the
99 county that contains a majority of the qualified electors of the
100 district.
Page 4 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1051-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1051 2026
101 (b) "Subdistrict" means the area or region previously
102 contained in a community development district that has been
103 merged with one or more other community development districts to
104 form a surviving merged district pursuant to s. 190.046.
105 (2) APPLICATION.—Any member of the board of supervisors of
106 a community development district who is elected to the board by
107 the qualified electors of the community development district,
108 and who has served at least one-fourth of his or her term of
109 office, may be removed from office by the qualified electors of
110 the district. If the member represents a subdistrict and is
111 elected only by electors residing in that subdistrict, only
112 electors residing in that subdistrict are eligible to sign the
113 petition to recall that member and are entitled to vote in the
114 recall election. If the member is elected at large by the
115 electors of the district, all electors of the district are
116 eligible to sign the petition to recall that member and are
117 entitled to vote in the recall election. Members may be removed
118 from office pursuant to the procedures provided in this section.
119 (3) GROUNDS FOR RECALL.—The grounds for removal of members
120 of the board of supervisors of a district elected by qualified
121 electors are, for the purposes of this act, limited to the
122 following reasons and must be contained in the recall petition:
123 (a) Malfeasance;
124 (b) Misfeasance;
125 (c) Neglect of duty;
Page 5 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1051-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1051 2026
126 (d) Drunkenness;
127 (e) Incompetence;
128 (f) Permanent inability to perform official duties; or
129 (g) Conviction of a felony involving moral turpitude.
130 (4) RECALL PETITION.—
131 (a) Petition content.—A recall petition must contain the
132 name of the board member sought to be recalled and a statement
133 of grounds for recall, which are limited solely to those
134 specified in subsection (3). If more than one member of the
135 board of supervisors is sought to be recalled, regardless of
136 whether such member is elected by the electors of a district or
137 by the electors of a subdistrict, a separate recall petition
138 must be prepared for each board member sought to be recalled.
139 (b) Requisite signatures.—The petition must be signed by
140 at least 10 percent of the total number of registered electors
141 of the district or of a subdistrict.
142 (c) Recall committee.—The qualified electors of the
143 district making charges contained in the statement of grounds
144 for recall, as well as those signing the recall petition, must
145 be designated as the recall committee. A specific person must be
146 designated in the petition as chair of the committee, and this
147 person shall act on behalf of the committee and be personally
148 responsible for the payment of the costs of the committee as set
149 forth in this section. The recall committee and the board member
150 being recalled are subject to chapter 106.
Page 6 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1051-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1051 2026
151 (d) Signature process.—Only electors of the district or
152 subdistrict, as applicable, are eligible to sign the recall
153 petition. Each petition must contain appropriate lines for each
154 elector's original signature which signature shall be made in
155 ink or indelible pencil; printed name; street address; city;
156 county; voter registration number or date of birth; Florida
157 driver license number, Florida identification card number issued
158 pursuant to s. 322.051, or the last four digits of the elector's
159 social security number; and the date signed.
160 (e) Filing of signed petitions.—The recall petition and
161 its accompanying signature pages must be filed by the chair of
162 the recall committee no later than 35 days after the date on
163 which the first signature is obtained on the recall petition.
164 The petition may not be amended after it is filed with the
165 clerk, except as provided in subparagraph (h)3.
166 (f) Notification.—The clerk shall provide written notice,
167 by certified mail, to the district's registered agent and the
168 board member subject to recall that a recall petition has been
169 filed, and provide a copy of such petition, within 7 days of
170 receipt of the recall petition.
171 (g) Verification of signatures.—
172 1. No more than 60 days after the date on which the recall
173 petition is filed, the clerk shall submit the recall petition to
174 the supervisor of elections, who shall promptly verify the
175 signatures in accordance with s. 99.097 and determine whether
Page 7 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1051-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1051 2026
176 the requisite number of valid signatures has been obtained. The
177 recall committee must pay in advance to the supervisor of
178 elections the actual cost of such signature verification. If the
179 community development district lies in more than one county, the
180 clerk shall submit the recall petition to the supervisor of
181 elections in each county in which the district is located. In
182 such event, the supervisor of elections of each county shall
183 make a determination as to whether the requisite number of
184 verified and valid signatures has been submitted for their
185 respective jurisdictions, and upon receipt of such
186 determinations, the supervisor of elections of the county in
187 which the clerk is located shall be responsible for providing
188 the reporting required by paragraph (h).
189 2. The petition and its accompanying documents provided to
190 the clerk shall, upon request, be made available in alternative
191 formats by the recall committee as requested by the clerk.
192 (h) Reporting.—
193 1. If the supervisor of elections determines that the
194 recall petition does not contain the requisite number of
195 verified and valid signatures, the recall proceedings are
196 terminated and the clerk must provide written notice of such
197 insufficiency determination and termination of recall
198 proceedings to the district's registered agent, the board member
199 subject to recall, and the recall committee without taking
200 further action. Any recall petition deemed insufficient may not
Page 8 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1051-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1051 2026
201 be used in any other proceeding.
202 2. If the supervisor of elections determines that the
203 petition has the requisite number of verified and valid
204 signatures, the clerk shall provide written notice, by certified
205 mail, to the district's registered agent and the recall
206 committee of the recall petition sufficiency determination, and
207 shall serve upon the board member sought to be recalled, by
208 certified mail, notice of such certification and a request that
209 the board member submit a rebuttal statement to the clerk within
210 30 days of receipt of the request.
211 3. A qualified elector may have his or her name removed
212 from the recall petition by submitting a signed request in
213 writing to the clerk stating such. Within 7 days of a qualified
214 elector notifying the clerk to remove his or her name from the
215 recall petition, the clerk shall recalculate the current
216 percentage of verified and valid signatures. In the event the
217 clerk determines that the number of current verified and valid
218 signatures falls below the threshold required by paragraph (b),
219 the clerk shall send written notice of such insufficiency
220 determination and termination of recall proceedings to the
221 district's registered agent, the board member subject to recall,
222 and the recall committee without taking further action.
223 (5) RECORD OF RECALL PROCEEDINGS.—If the supervisor of
224 elections determines that a recall petition has the requisite
225 number of verified and valid signatures, and within 30 days
Page 9 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1051-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1051 2026
226 after the date of receipt of the rebuttal statement or after the
227 last date a rebuttal statement could have been filed, the clerk
228 shall prepare a document entitled "Record of Recall
229 Proceedings." The Record of Recall Proceedings shall consist of
230 the recall petition, the determination of the supervisor of
231 elections regarding the amount of verified and valid signatures,
232 and the rebuttal statement, if provided, or, if no rebuttal
233 statement was received, an indication that none was received.
234 The Record of Recall Proceedings shall be sent by certified mail
235 to the district's registered agent, the board member subject to
236 recall, and the chair of the recall committee. The district
237 shall post the Record of Recall Proceedings on its website
238 within 14 days of receipt.
239 (6) RECALL REFERENDUM PETITION.-
240 (a) Petition content.—Upon the receipt of the Record of
241 Recall Proceedings, the recall committee may circulate a
242 petition on whether a referendum to recall the board member
243 should be held. A recall referendum petition must contain the
244 name of the person sought to be recalled and a copy of the
245 Record of Recall Proceedings.
246 (b) Requisite signatures.—The signed recall referendum
247 must be signed by at least 15 percent of the electors.
248 (c) Signature process.—All qualified electors of the
249 district are eligible to sign the recall referendum petition.
250 Each recall referendum petition must contain appropriate lines
Page 10 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1051-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1051 2026
251 for each qualified elector's original signature which signature
252 shall be made in ink or indelible pencil; printed name; street
253 address; city; county; voter registration number or date of
254 birth; Florida driver license number, Florida identification
255 card number issued pursuant to s. 322.051, or the last four
256 digits of the qualified elector's social security number; and
257 the date signed.
258 (d) Filing of signed petitions.-The signed recall
259 referendum petition and its accompanying signature pages shall
260 be filed with the clerk no later than 60 days after the chair of
261 the recall committee's receipt of the Record of Recall
262 Proceedings.
263 (e) Notification.—The clerk shall provide written notice,
264 by certified mail, to the district's registered agent and the
265 board member subject to recall that a recall referendum petition
266 has been filed, and provide a copy of such petition, within 7
267 days of receipt of the recall referendum petition.
268 (f) Verification of signatures.—
269 1. No more than 30 days after the date on which the recall
270 referendum petition is filed, the clerk shall submit the recall
271 referendum petition to the supervisor of elections, who shall
272 promptly verify the signatures in accordance with s. 99.097 and
273 determine whether the requisite number of valid signatures has
274 been obtained. The recall committee must pay in advance to the
275 supervisor of elections the actual cost of such signature
Page 11 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1051-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1051 2026
276 verification. If the community development district lies in more
277 than one county, the clerk shall submit the recall referendum
278 petition to the supervisor of elections in each county in which
279 the district is located. In such event, the supervisor of
280 elections of each county shall make a determination as to
281 whether the requisite number of verified and valid signatures
282 has been submitted for their respective jurisdictions, and upon
283 receipt of such determinations, the supervisor of elections of
284 the county in which the clerk is located shall be responsible
285 for providing the reporting required by paragraph (g).
286 2. The recall referendum petition and its accompanying
287 documents provided to the clerk shall, upon request, be made
288 available in alternative formats by the recall committee as
289 requested by the clerk.
290 (g) Reporting.—
291 1. If the supervisor of elections determines that the
292 recall referendum petition does not contain the requisite number
293 of verified and valid signatures, the recall vote proceedings
294 are terminated and the clerk must provide written notice of such
295 insufficiency determination and termination of recall vote
296 proceedings to the registered agent of the district, the board
297 member subject to recall, and the recall committee without
298 taking further action. Any recall referendum petition deemed
299 insufficient may not be used in any other proceeding.
300 2. If the supervisor of elections determines that the
Page 12 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1051-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1051 2026
301 recall referendum petition has the requisite number of verified
302 and valid signatures, the clerk shall provide written notice, by
303 certified mail, to the district's registered agent, the board
304 member sought to be recalled, and the recall committee of the
305 recall referendum petition sufficiency determination and the
306 date, time, and location of the recall referendum.
307 3. Within 7 days of a qualified elector notifying the
308 clerk to remove his or her name from the recall referendum
309 petition, the clerk shall recalculate the current percentage of
310 verified and valid signatures. In the event that the number of
311 current verified and valid signatures falls below the threshold
312 required by paragraph (b), the clerk shall send written notice
313 of such insufficiency determination and termination of recall
314 proceedings to the district's registered agent, the board member
315 subject to recall, and the recall committee without taking
316 further action.
317 (7) RECALL REFERENDUM.—
318 (a) Upon its confirmation that the recall referendum
319 petition has the requisite number of verified and valid
320 signatures, the supervisor of elections shall fix a day for
321 holding the recall referendum. The supervisor of elections shall
322 administer such referendum in accordance with s. 190.006(3)(d).
323 The recall committee must pay in advance to the supervisor of
324 elections the actual cost of holding the recall referendum.
325 (b) Any recall election must be held not less than 30 days
Page 13 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1051-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1051 2026
326 or more than 90 days after the certification, and at the same
327 time as any other general or special election held within such
328 period; but if no such election is to be held within that
329 period, the referendum must be conducted at a special election
330 to be held within the period aforesaid.
331 (c) Notice of the recall referendum shall be published by
332 the district in a newspaper of general circulation in the area
333 of the district at least 14 days in advance of such referendum.
334 Notice of the recall referendum shall also be mailed to each
335 qualified elector at his or her last known address at least 14
336 days in advance of such referendum. The board shall use and rely
337 upon the official records maintained by the supervisor of
338 elections and property appraiser or tax collector in each county
339 in determining such addresses. The notices shall contain the
340 date, time, and location of the referendum and shall include a
341 statement that the Record of Recall Proceedings is available for
342 review on the district's website. The recall committee must pay
343 in advance to the district the actual cost of the recall
344 referendum notices.
345 (d) The ballots at the recall referendum must conform to
346 the following: With respect to each person whose removal is
347 sought, the question must be submitted: "Shall (name of person)
348 be removed as a member of the board of supervisors of (name of
349 community development district) by recall?" Immediately
350 following each question there must be printed on the ballots the
Page 14 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1051-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1051 2026
351 two propositions in the following order:
352 "...(name of person)... should be removed from office."
353 "...(name of person)... should not be removed from office."
354 (e) A recall referendum authorized by this section shall
355 be canceled by the supervisor of elections if the board member
356 subject to the recall submits his or her irrevocable resignation
357 in advance of such referendum. The district must promptly
358 provide the clerk and the supervisor of elections a copy of any
359 such resignation, but no more than 7 days after receipt of same.
360 (8) FILLING OF VACANCIES CREATED BY RECALL.—
361 (a) If a majority of the qualified electors of the
362 district or subdistrict approve the recall of the board member
363 in the recall referendum, as determined by the supervisor of
364 elections, the board member subject to the recall immediately
365 ceases to hold office. The vacancy created by the recall must be
366 filled by the board of supervisors pursuant to s. 190.006(4),
367 except that, if 3 or more board members are recalled at the same
368 referendum, the Governor shall fill the vacancy pursuant to s.
369 114.04.
370 (b) If a majority of the qualified electors of the
371 district or subdistrict do not approve the recall, the recall
372 proceedings are terminated.
373 (9) RESTRICTIONS ON BOARD APPOINTMENT.—A person who is
374 removed by a recall pursuant to this section, or resigns after a
375 petition has been filed against him or her, is not eligible to
Page 15 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1051-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1051 2026
376 be appointed to the district's board of supervisors within a
377 period of 2 years after the date of such recall or resignation.
378 (10) RETENTION OF PETITION.—The clerk shall preserve all
379 papers comprising or connected with a petition for recall for a
380 period of 2 years after they are filed.
381 (11) OFFENSES RELATING TO RECALL PETITIONS AND RECALL
382 REFERENDUM PETITIONS.—A person may not impersonate another,
383 purposely write his or her name or residence falsely in the
384 signing of any recall petition or recall referendum petition or
385 forge any name thereto, or sign any paper with knowledge that he
386 or she is not a qualified elector of the district. A person may
387 not employ or pay another to accept employment or payment for
388 circulating or witnessing a recall petition or recall referendum
389 petition. A person who violates this section commits a
390 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s.
391 775.082 or s. 775.083.
392 Section 4. Paragraph (e) is added to subsection (3) of
393 section 190.006, Florida Statutes, to read:
394 190.006 Board of supervisors; members and meetings.—
395 (3)
396 (e) Any board member elected to the board of supervisors
397 by the qualified electors of the district pursuant to this
398 subsection is subject to the recall procedures provided for in
399 s. 190.0071.
400 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 16 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1051-02-c2